Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
451D

HEALTH
CARE PROFESSIONALS

Section

451D-1 Construction of laws

451D-2 Definitions

451D-3 Powers

451D-4 Advisory committees

451D-5 Filing of electronic mail address

Cross References

Client-patient referrals, health care provider practices
regulated, see §431:10C-308.7.

Diversion program for chemically dependent nurses, see
chapter 334D.

Health care peer review, see chapter 671D.

Mental health, alcohol, or drug abuse treatment reviews, see
chapter 334B.

Primary health care incentive program, see §321-1.5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next